src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>не NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>не PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>не PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>не%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Dat+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>не%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;

@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Nom+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>%{ЕОØ%}не NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>%{ЕОØ%}не%>нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+Pl+Dat+PxSg1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%^PXSG1%>%{ЕОØ%}не%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
!!€ кядь%^PXSG1%>не
!!€ кяд00%>не
!!€ ярмак%^PXSG1%>%{ЕОØ%}не
!!€ ярмак0%>оне

LEXICON SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>це NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>це SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>це SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG1 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>це%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>це%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ; !-ге Бебан, Кирдяшкин, Ларионов, Левчаев, Алёшкин
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Sg+Dat+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>цти K/DAT-ARAM ; !-ге/вок Бебан, Девин, Кирдяшкин, Кишняшкин, Кудашов, Кузнецов, Ларионов, Левчаев, Макулов, Моисеев, Мокша А 1998, Носиков,  

LEXICON PL-CX-PXSG2
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
LEXICON PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{Х%}тне NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{Х%}тне PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{Х%}тне PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL1 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{Х%}тне%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+Pl+Dat+PxSg2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{Х%}тне%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;

LEXICON SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}ц NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}ц SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}ц SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нц NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нцты K/DAT-ARAM ;
LEXICON PL-CX-PXSG3
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
LEXICON PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+Pl+Dat+PxSg3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}%>нды K/DAT-ARAM ;


LEXICON PXPL1
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
LEXICON PXPL2
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
LEXICON PXPL3
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL3 ;


LEXICON SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} NounEnd_K ;

@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Dat+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Dat+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконди K/DAT-ARAM ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;

@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ноконь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ноконь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Dat+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ноконди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Dat+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ноконди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG2 ;

!+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконь NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Dat+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконди NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньке NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}ньк%{ЕО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;
!+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконь NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Dat+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}ньконди NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL2 ;


LEXICON SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Dat+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Dat+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG1 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG1 ;
!+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Dat+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нди NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL1 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нте PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL1 ;
!+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Dat+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нте%>%{ЕОØ%}нди NounEnd_K ;
